Hawaii statutes.
§11-425 Maximum amount of public
funds available to candidate. (a) The maximum amount of public funds
available in each election to a candidate for the office of governor,
lieutenant governor, or mayor shall not exceed ten per cent of the expenditure
limit established in section 11-423(d) for each election.

(b) The maximum amount of public funds
available in each election to a candidate for the office of state senator,
state representative, county council member, and prosecuting attorney shall not
exceed fifteen per cent of the expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d)
for each election.

(c) For the office of Hawaiian affairs, the
maximum amount of public funds available to a candidate shall not exceed $1,500
in any election year.

(d) For all other offices, the maximum amount
of public funds available to a candidate shall not exceed $100 in any election
year.

(e) Each candidate who qualified for the
maximum amount of public funding in any primary election and who is a candidate
for a subsequent general election shall apply with the commission to be
qualified to receive the maximum amount of public funds as provided in this
section for the respective general election. For purposes of this section, "qualified"
means meeting the qualifying campaign contribution requirements of section 11-429.
[L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 5, §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next